Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-9105
City, village, business, or nonprofit
organization; duties; participant in athletic activity; actions required;
notice to parent or guardian; effect of signature of licensed health care
professional.

(1)
Any city, village, business, or nonprofit organization that organizes an athletic
activity in which the athletes are nineteen years of age or younger and are
required to pay a fee to participate in the athletic activity or whose cost
to participate in the athletic activity is sponsored by a business or nonprofit
organization shall:

(a) Make available
training approved by the chief medical officer on how to recognize the symptoms
of a concussion or brain injury and how to seek proper medical treatment for
a concussion or brain injury to all coaches; and

(b) Provide information
on concussions and brain injuries to all coaches and athletes and to a parent
or guardian of each athlete that shall include, but need not be limited to:

(i) The signs
and symptoms of a concussion;

(ii) The risks posed by sustaining a concussion;
and

(iii) The actions an athlete should take in response to sustaining
a concussion, including the notification of his or her coaches.

(2)(a) An athlete
who participates in an athletic activity under subsection (1) of this section
shall be removed from a practice or game when he or she is reasonably suspected
of having sustained a concussion or brain injury in such practice or game
after observation by a coach or a licensed health care professional. Such
athlete shall not be permitted to participate in any supervised athletic activities
involving physical exertion, including, but not limited to, practices or games,
until the athlete (i) has been evaluated by a licensed health care professional,
(ii) has received written and signed clearance to resume participation in
athletic activities from the licensed health care professional, and (iii)
has submitted the written and signed clearance to resume participation in
athletic activities to the city, village, business, or nonprofit organization
that organized the athletic activity accompanied by written permission to
resume participation from the athlete's parent or guardian.

(b) If an athlete
is reasonably suspected after observation of having sustained a concussion
or brain injury and is removed from an athletic activity under subdivision
(2)(a) of this section, the parent or guardian of the athlete shall be notified
by the coach or a representative of the city, village, business, or nonprofit
organization that organized the athletic activity of the date and approximate
time of the injury suffered by the athlete, the signs and symptoms of a concussion
or brain injury that were observed, and any actions taken to treat the athlete.

(c) Nothing in this subsection
shall be construed to require any city, village, business, or nonprofit organization
to provide for the presence of a licensed health care professional at any
practice or game.

(d) The signature of
an individual who represents that he or she is a licensed health care professional
on a written clearance to resume participation that is provided to a city,
village, business, or nonprofit organization shall be deemed to be conclusive
and reliable evidence that the individual who signed the clearance is a licensed
health care professional. The city, village, business, or nonprofit organization
shall not be required to determine or verify the individual's qualifications.

Laws 2011, LB260, § 5.